North Carolina statutes. Chapter 123. Impeachment.
Article 2. Procedure in Impeachment.

§ 123-6.
Articles of impeachment preferred.

All impeachments must be delivered by the House of Representatives to the presiding officer of the Senate, who shall thereupon cause proclamation to be made in the following words:

“All persons are commanded to keep silence, on pain of imprisonment, while the House of Representatives is exhibiting to the Senate of North Carolina articles of impeachment against
_______________ .”

After which the articles shall be exhibited, and then the presiding officer of the Senate shall inform the House of Representatives that the Senate will take proper order on the subject of impeachment, of which due notice shall be given to the House of Representatives.

History.

1868-9, c. 168, ss. 2, 3; Code, s. 2925; Rev., s. 4630; C.S., s. 6249.

§ 123-7.
When President of Senate impeached, another officer chosen.

If the President of the Senate be impeached, notice thereof shall immediately be given to the Senate by the House of Representatives, in order that another President may be chosen.

History.

1868-9, c. 168, s. 14; Code, s. 2935; Rev., s. 4631; C.S., s. 6250.

§ 123-8.
Notice given to the accused.

The Senate, upon the presentation of articles of impeachment and its organization as a court, shall forthwith cause the person impeached to appear and answer the articles exhibited, either in person or by attorney. He shall be entitled to a copy of the impeachment and have a reasonable time to answer the same.

History.

1868-9, c. 168, s. 7; Code, s. 2928; Rev., s. 4632; C.S., s. 6251.

§ 123-9.
Accused entitled to counsel.

The person accused is entitled on the trial of impeachment to the aid of counsel.

History.

1868-9, c. 168, s. 8; Code, s. 2929; Rev., s. 4629; C.S., s. 6252.

§ 123-10.
Time of hearing fixed.

When issue is joined in the trial of an impeachment the court shall fix a time and place for the trial thereof.

History.

1868-9, c. 168, s. 9; Code, s. 2930; Rev., s. 4633; C.S., s. 6253.

§ 123-11.
Oath administered to members.

At the time and place appointed, and before the commencement of the trial, the presiding officer of the Senate shall administer to each member of the court then present, and to other members as they appear, an oath or affirmation truly and impartially to try and determine the charge in question, under the Constitution and laws, according to the evidence. No member of the court shall sit or give his vote upon the trial until he shall have taken such oath or affirmation.

History.

1868-9, c. 168, s. 10; Code, s. 2931; Rev., s. 4625; C.S., s. 6254.